District of Columbia statutes.
19-313

Death of distributee before distribution.

When a person entitled to distribution dies before the distribution is made, his share goes to his estate or legal representatives.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-313.
1973 Ed., § 19-313.